Washington statutes.
RCW 43.136.055

Review of tax preferences by joint legislative audit and review committee—Recommendations.

(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee must review tax preferences according to the schedule developed under RCW 43.136.045. The committee must consider, but not be limited to, the following factors in the review as relevant to each particular tax preference:

(a) The classes of individuals, types of organizations, or types of industries whose state tax liabilities are directly affected by the tax preference;

(b) Public policy objectives that might provide a justification for the tax preference, including but not limited to the legislative history, any legislative intent, or the extent to which the tax preference encourages business growth or relocation into this state, promotes growth or retention of high wage jobs, or helps stabilize communities;

(c) Evidence that the existence of the tax preference has contributed to the achievement of any of the public policy objectives;

(d) The extent to which continuation of the tax preference might contribute to any of the public policy objectives;

(e) The extent to which the tax preference may provide unintended benefits to an individual, organization, or industry other than those the legislature intended;

(f) The extent to which terminating the tax preference may have negative effects on the category of taxpayers that currently benefit from the tax preference, and the extent to which resulting higher taxes may have negative effects on employment and the economy;

(g) The feasibility of modifying the tax preference to provide for adjustment or recapture of the tax benefits of the tax preference if the objectives are not fulfilled;

(h) Fiscal impacts of the tax preference, including past impacts and expected future impacts if it is continued. For the purposes of this subsection, "fiscal impact" includes an analysis of the general effects of the tax preference on the overall state economy, including, but not limited to, the effects of the tax preference on the consumption and expenditures of persons and businesses within the state;

(i) The extent to which termination of the tax preference would affect the distribution of liability for payment of state taxes;

(j) The economic impact of the tax preference compared to the economic impact of government activities funded by the tax for which the tax preference is taken at the same level of expenditure as the tax preference. For purposes of this subsection the economic impact shall be determined using the Washington input-output model as published by the office of financial management;

(k) Consideration of similar tax preferences adopted in other states, and potential public policy benefits that might be gained by incorporating corresponding provisions in Washington.

(2) For each tax preference, the committee must provide a recommendation as to whether the tax preference should be continued without modification, modified, scheduled for sunset review at a future date, or terminated immediately. The committee may recommend accountability standards for the future review of a tax preference.

[ 2011 c 335 s 3; 2006 c 197 s 5.]